Massachusetts, session 194th, H2084.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The Massachusetts General Laws are hereby amended by inserting the following new
chapter:
An Act for a Minimum Hourly Health Improvement Wage.
1.) Healthcare costs, and insurance, are vital topics, and proper subjects of government
operations, and public policy, for all residents of the Commonwealth; and so this Minimum
Hourly Health Improvement Wage, is proposed, to assist in better health services, and financing.
2.) As economic conditions, have changed, sometimes in unfortunate ways, many
individuals have found the need, or availability, to only be able to work at one or more, part-time
jobs. Many, or even most of these positions, lack full benefits, further stressing these individual
of 3

employees. In order to earn sufficient resources, and sometimes not enough, even then, many
individuals are working, in excess of the number of hours of a full-time job, and despite the
stress, and additional travel time, have challenged access to medical services.
3.) While various programs have been developed, and have varieties of value, medical
services insurances, are still strongly associated with employment. Developments at the Federal
level, as well as state circumstances, continue to evolve, and it is in this context that this
legislation, is created.
4.) The Public Health Council (PHC), and the Department of Public Health (DPH), are
hereby authorized, and empowered to analyze, and develop recommendations for a Minimum
Health Care Improvement Wage. The PHC, and the DPH, shall have the power to establish
suitable Regulations, for both the Pilot Programs, and implementation of full programs, after
suitable Pilot Program development.
5.) An amount, shall be determined, by which each employee will receive a portable,
health care insurance earning, for each, and every hour worked. In so doing, for example, if an
employee worked two separate jobs, of 20 hours each, they would receive 40 hours of Minimum
Health Care Improvement Wage. If an employee worked three separate jobs of 18 hours each,
they would receive 54 hours of Minimum Health Care Improvement Wage, thereby also
adjusting in some general way, for the risks, of excessive work hours, and stress.
6.) All employers, of at least 50 employees, would, and/or should find, an equality of
operations, in terms of health care costs, since some amount would accrue to each employee, for
each hour worked; in other words, a condition of business, would be the provision and/or
contribution of some health care compensation.
of 3

7.) This Minimum Health Care Improvement Wage, can be first established, as a Pilot
Program; after which, based on experience, it shall be recommended for full implementation.
8.) Costs of such a program, are a cost of doing business for an employer. Specific tax
credits, during the Pilot Program period can, and should be, recommended, and implemented; to
be further defined, and utilized, at the time of a more complete, comprehensive, and permanent
program.
9.) Employers of less than 50 employees, would be entitled to voluntary participation,
including specific tax credits, during the Pilot Program period.
of 3